Mississippi statutes. Title 69. Agriculture, Horticulture, and Animals
Article 1. General Stock Law.

§ 69-13-1.
General stock law.

There is declared, created and now in existence a statewide stock law which embraces all of the territory of the State of Mississippi and which is declared to be uniform throughout the state, except as hereinafter provided. Any person or persons owning or having under control any livestock such as cattle, horses, mules, jacks, jennets, sheep, goats and hogs, shall not permit such livestock to run at large upon the open or unfenced lands of another person, except as herein expressly provided, but shall keep such livestock confined in a safe inclosure or upon lands belonging to such person. However, upon the petition of twenty percent of the qualified electors of any county of this state, outside of the municipalities thereof, the board of supervisors of such county shall call an election to be held within sixty days after the filing of such petition for the purpose of permitting the qualified electors of such county, outside of the municipalities, to vote upon the question whether or not the provisions of the statewide stock law shall remain in force in such county, outside of the municipalities thereof; and if a majority of the qualified electors of such county, outside of the municipalities thereof, voting in said election, shall vote to sustain the statewide stock law, then it shall remain in full force and effect in said county, but should a majority of the qualified electors of said county, outside of said municipalities, voting in said election, vote against the statewide stock law, then sixty days after said election the provisions thereof shall not apply to or be in force in said county, outside of the municipalities thereof, except in its application to hogs or swine, which shall not be permitted in any event to run at large in any county of this state.

In the event a county has heretofore elected to come out from under the stock law, no less than five years after such election, upon the petition of twenty percent of the qualified electors of any such county outside the municipalities thereof, the board of supervisors shall call an election to be held within sixty days after the filing of such petition to vote upon the question of whether or not the provisions of the statewide stock law shall apply in that county outside the municipalities. If a majority of the qualified electors of such county, outside of the municipalities thereof, voting in said election, shall favor the statewide stock law, then sixty days after said election the provisions of the statewide stock law shall apply in that county outside the municipalities. If the majority of those voting in the election vote against the statewide stock law, the provisions of the statewide stock law shall continue to be inapplicable to such county outside municipalities. No election on the same question may be held more often than once every two years.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, § 5441; 1942, § 4864; Laws, 1926, ch. 263; Laws, 1931, ch. 23; Laws, 1968, ch. 243, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved August 7, 1968).

§ 69-13-3.
Election; ballots.

The board of supervisors shall provide for the holding of elections under the provisions of this article in the same manner as now provided by law for holding special elections in the county and the ballots for such election shall have written or printed upon them the following:

“For State-Wide Stock Law Against State-Wide Stock Law ”

Click to view

But the result of said election in any county shall in no wise affect the operation of the state-wide stock law in so far as it relates to hogs. When an election has been held in any county, then no other election shall be held in that county within twelve months.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4866; Laws, 1931, ch. 23.

§ 69-13-5.
Counties; excepted.

The provisions of this article as to holding elections as provided in Section 69-13-1, shall not apply in any county where or in which more than one-fourth of the total number of acres of land in such county, according to the federal farm census of 1930, are in actual cultivation, that is to say that in all counties in the state in which one-fourth of the land is in cultivation, according to the federal farm census of 1930, the provisions of the state-wide stock law shall be and remain in full force and effect.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4867; Laws, 1931, ch. 23.

§ 69-13-7.
Fences.

If two or more adjoining counties shall at an election called pursuant to Section 69-13-1, vote against the state-wide stock law, then in such case, no fence or other barrier along the boundary lines of such county shall be necessary. However, in the event that two or more counties shall at such an election vote against the state-wide stock law, but an adjoining county or counties shall elect to remain under the provisions of the state-wide stock law, then the county or counties voting against the state-wide stock law shall, at its or their own proper cost and expense, before the provisions hereof shall become effective in such county or counties, build and erect and maintain along the line or lines of such counties a good and substantial fence or other sufficient barrier to prevent the intrusion of all such livestock mentioned in Section 69-13-1 as are permitted by the provisions of said section in such county or counties voting against the state-wide stock law, over, on, and upon the territory of the county or counties remaining under the provisions of the state-wide stock law. The fence herein provided shall be a fence satisfactory to and prescribed by the board of animal health, but no cattle guard or other obstruction shall be constructed or placed on any state highway. However, any infested county must provide watchmen night and day at such points to prevent cattle from passing through the gap where county fences would cross state highways.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4865; Laws, 1931, ch. 23.

§ 69-13-9.
Lawful fence in open range counties defined.

In open range counties all fences four feet high, in good repair, and substantially and closely built with rails, planks, pickets, hedges or other substantial material, or with wires or wires and plank are lawful fences; and lawful fences may be made by raising the ground into a ridge and erecting thereon a fence of rails, planks, pickets, hedges, wires, or planks and wires, or other substantial material so that the ridge and fence together be four feet high, and such material so used shall not be more than six inches apart.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4865-01; Laws, 1946, ch. 435, §§ 1, 2.

§ 69-13-11.
Stock law districts in counties with sea walls.

In counties in the State of Mississippi wherein sea walls or similar structures are constructed and maintained by the county, and in which there are two or more municipalities, each of which have ten thousand inhabitants or more, the board of supervisors in such counties may, by ordinance, create a stock law district of such area adjoining such sea wall or structure as such board may determine and adjudicate, not to extend more than one mile from such sea wall. The ordinance which may be so adopted by the board of supervisors creating such a stock law district may prohibit live stock such as cattle, horses, mules, jacks, jennets, sheep, goats, or hogs, running at large within the territory so designated as the stock law district, and such ordinance so adopted by the board of supervisors shall provide the method in which such stock law may be enforced in said district, and the penalty for the violation thereof, shall be in accordance with the provisions of the general statewide stock law.

The board of supervisors is hereby authorized and empowered to accept donations, grants or gifts from any private individual, corporation or organization, for the purpose of building and constructing fence or fences as necessary to protect such area.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4869; Laws, 1938, ch. 291.

§ 69-13-13.
Tick reinfestation.

If any county in the State of Mississippi by vote comes from under the provisions of the present state-wide stock law, and said county thereafter becomes tick infested, all expenditures in connection with the tick eradication in said county or tick infested area or areas, must be paid from the funds of said county, except the salary and expenses of the state officers and agents. Furthermore, any county that comes from under the state-wide stock law under the provisions of Sections 69-13-1 through 69-13-27 and becomes infested with the Texas fever tick, the same shall, on complaint of the board of animal health, go back under the provisions of the state-wide stock law.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4868; Laws, 1931, ch. 23.

§ 69-13-15.
Stock taken up; what done.

Any livestock as referred to in Section 69-13-1, found running at large upon the lands of any other person than the owner or custodian of such stock, may be taken up by any sheriff, constable, marshal, or other peace officer of the state within his territorial jurisdiction, and confined within a safe enclosure. If such animal, or animals, taken up be infested with, or exposed to Texas fever tick, they may be dipped by such officers, or persons, having such animal, or animals, so confined, until said livestock are free from infestation, and said dipping shall be under the rules and regulations prescribed by the board of animal health as near as possible. And the charges for so taking up and confining, together with any damage done by said stock, if any, shall be a special, first and paramount lien upon said livestock, and unless same are paid by the owner, or persons having such livestock under his control, when so notified, such livestock shall be sold as estrays, and the cost of taking up and confining, and damages, if any, together with other costs and expenses, shall first be deducted, and the balance, if any, shall be paid to the owner, or person having such livestock under his control, and the officer, or person, taking up such livestock, in addition to all other charges as now allowed by law, shall receive 50 cents per head for each dipping of each animal infested with or exposed to fever tick.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, § 5442; 1942, § 4870; Laws, 1926, ch. 263.

§ 69-13-17.
Any person may take up stock.

Any such livestock as referred to in Section 69-13-1 may be taken up and confined by any person upon whose land such animal, or animals, may have entered or may be found, such person not having consented for the animal, or animals, to run at large on such land, and when so taken up shall be dealt with as estrays. For taking up any animal the person so taking the animal up shall be allowed Ten Dollars ($10.00) per head for each animal so taken up, but in no case shall he be entitled to receive more than Fifty Dollars ($50.00) for stock taken up at any one time. He may also receive reasonable compensation for feeding and caring for such animals while keeping them.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1857, ch. 16, art. 16; 1871, § 1922; 1880, § 985; 1892, §§ 2046, 2047; 1906, §§ 2225, 2226; Hemingway’s 1917, §§ 4544, 4545; 1930, § 5444; 1942, § 4872; Laws, 1978, ch. 372, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1978.

§ 69-13-19.
Owner liable for damages.

Every owner of livestock referred to in Section 69-13-1 shall be liable for damages for all injuries and trespasses committed by such animals by breaking and entering into or upon the lands, grounds, or premises of another person; and the person injured shall have a lien upon the animal, or animals, trespassing for all such damage. The damages for such trespass shall not be less than Ten Dollars ($10.00) for each horse, cow or hog, and Five Dollars ($5.00) for each of the other kinds of stock; and for every succeeding offense, after the owner has been notified of the first trespass or injury, double damages shall be recovered with costs. For breaking or entering into a pasture or waste ground, however, double damage shall not be recoverable, and the damages in such cases may be assessed as low as Eight Dollars ($8.00) for each horse, cow or hog and Two Dollars ($2.00) for each of the other kinds of livestock.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hutchinson’s 1848, ch. 12, art. 6 (1); 1857, ch. 16, art. 15; 1871, § 1921; 1880, § 984; 1892, §§ 2043, 2044, 2045; 1906, §§ 2222, 2223, 2224; Hemingway’s 1917, §§ 4541, 4542, 4543; 1930, § 5443; 1942, § 4871; Laws, 1978, ch. 376, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1978.

§ 69-13-21.
How lien enforced.

The person taking up an animal trespassing, after two days may begin his action to recover damages and charges and to enforce his lien, by filing a bill of particulars of his damages, together with a description of the animal on which the lien is claimed, with a justice of the peace, if his claim does not exceed two hundred dollars; and the justice shall issue a summons for the owner or person entitled to the custody, returnable instanter at such place as he shall designate; and if the animal be not in the custody of the plaintiff, the justice may issue a writ commanding the officer to seize the animal. The summons being executed and returned, the justice shall proceed as in other suits. If the justice finds in favor of the plaintiff, he will assess the damages and charges and enter judgment accordingly, and direct the animal to be sold to satisfy the judgment; and if the animal be not in custody of the plaintiff or officer the order for sale may embrace a command to levy upon it.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1880, § 985; 1892, § 2049; 1906, § 2228; Hemingway’s 1917, § 4547; 1930, § 5445; 1942, § 4873.

§ 69-13-23.
Appeal to circuit court.

The party against whom judgment may be given in a case to enforce a lien pursuant to Section 69-13-21 may appeal to the circuit court as other cases.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1880, § 987; 1892, § 2050; 1906, § 2229: Hemingway’s 1917, § 4548; 1930, § 5446; 1942, § 4874.

§ 69-13-25.
Case brought in circuit court to enforce lien where over two hundred dollars claimed.

If the amount claimed for the damages by animals trespassing exceed two hundred dollars, the plaintiff will proceed by petition in the circuit court, wherein the proceedings shall be according to the practice of that court; and the clerk shall perform the ministerial duties prescribed for justices of the peace in cases before them.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1892, § 2051; 1906, § 2230; Hemingway’s 1917, § 4549; 1930, § 5447; 1942, § 4875.

§ 69-13-27.
Owner may replevy animal.

The owner of the animal, or person entitled to the custody, may, after suit is brought and before final judgment, replevy the animal by giving bond, with sufficient sureties, to be approved by the justice of the peace, clerk, constable, or sheriff, in double the value thereof; and thereafter the suit shall proceed and the bond be in the place of the animal, and judgment may be rendered against the obligors therein.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1880, § 986; 1892, § 2052; 1906, § 2231; Hemingway’s 1917, § 4550; 1930, § 5448; 1942, § 4876.